District of Columbia statutes.
29-802.04

Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

(a)

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the Mayor for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the Superior Court to order:

(1)

The person to sign the record;

(2)

The person to deliver the record to the Mayor for filing; or

(3)

The Mayor to file the record unsigned.

(b)

If a petitioner under subsection (a) of this section is not the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the company a party to the action.

(c)

A record filed under subsection (a)(3) of this section is effective without being signed.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(3)(D), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-801.07 and § 29-802.05.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added (c).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 204 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.